Washington statutes.
RCW 1.70.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

(2) "Legal material" means, whether or not in effect:

(a) The Washington state Constitution;

(b) The session laws of the state of Washington;

(c) The Revised Code of Washington;

(d) A state agency rule that has or had the effect of law;

(e) The Washington State Register; or

(f) The Washington Administrative Code.

(3) "Official publisher" means:

(a) For the Washington state Constitution, the secretary of state;

(b) For session laws of the state of Washington, the statute law committee;

(c) For the Revised Code of Washington, the statute law committee;

(d) For a rule published in the Washington State Register, the statute law committee;

(e) For a rule not published in the Washington State Register, the state agency adopting the rule;

(f) For the Washington State Register, the statute law committee; or

(g) For the Washington Administrative Code, the statute law committee.

(4) "Publish" means to display, present, or release to the public, or cause to be displayed, presented, or released to the public, by the official publisher.

(5) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(6) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

[ 2017 c 106 s 2.]